Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.030

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Fishery products" includes fish, crustaceans, mollusks, and marine products for human consumption.

(2) "Member" includes members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations organized with shares of stock.

(3) "Association" means any corporation organized under this chapter.

[ 1959 c 312 s 3.]